Wyoming, session 2025, HB0140.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-404 by creating a new subsection
(c) is amended to read:

15-1-404. Annexing territories; initiation of
proceedings; by governing bodies; determination.

HB0140

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0544
(c) Jurisdiction over a building permit or land use
application pending at the time that the subject land or
building was annexed under this section shall remain with
the county with whom the applications where filed. The
county's jurisdiction shall continue until issuance or
denial of the final building permit or land use
application, at which time jurisdiction shall transfer to
the annexing city or town.

Section 2. This act shall apply to annexations,
building permit applications and land use applications
filed on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0140